Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-731
District; formation; articles; filing and recording.

Within twenty days after the district has been declared a corporation by the court, the clerk thereof shall transmit to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the record relating thereto, and the same shall be filed in his office in the same manner as articles of incorporation are required to be filed under the general law concerning corporations. A copy of such record, together with a plat of the district, shall also be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which the district, or any part thereof, is situated.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 5, p. 197.